test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lovinjtangkve_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.
# (2007: 47)

  Verb - ловиньтаӈкве: # Verb 'translate_me' - full paradigm
    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Inf: ловиньтаӈкве

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: ловиньтэ̄в

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: ловиньтэгы̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: ловиньтэгын

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: ловиньтэ̄гыт

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu1: ловиньтыме̄н

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu2: ловиньтэгы̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu2: ловиньтэгын

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu3: ловиньтэ̄г

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: ловиньтэ̄гум

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: ловиньтэ̄гын
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: ловиньтэгын

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: ловиньты

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: ловиньтасум

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: ловиньтасын

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: ловиньтас

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu1: ловиньтасаме̄н

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu2: ловиньтасы̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu2: ловиньтасын

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu3: ловиньтасы̄г

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: ловиньтасӯв

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: ловиньтасы̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: ловиньтасын

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: ловиньтасыт

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg1: ловиньтнувум
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg1: ловиньтнӯвум

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg2: ловиньтнувын
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg2: ловиньтнӯвын

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg3: ловиньтнув

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu1: ловиньтнуваме̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu1: ловиньтнувамен

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu2: ловиньтнувы̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu2: ловиньтнувын

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu3: ловиньтнувы̄г

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl1: ловиньтнувӯв

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl2: ловиньтнувы̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl2: ловиньтнувын

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl3: ловиньтнувыт
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl3: ловиньтнӯвыт

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Imprt+ScDu2: ловиньтэ̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Imprt+ScDu2: ловиньтэн

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Imprt+ScPl2: ловиньтэ̄н

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Imprt+ScSg2: ловиньтэн

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg3: ловиньтылум

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcSg3: ловиньтылын

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg3: ловиньтытэ

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcSg3: ловиньтыламе̄н

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcSg3: ловиньтылы̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcSg3: ловиньтылын

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcSg3: ловиньтытэ̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcSg3: ловиньтытэн

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg3: ловиньтылӯв

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg3: ловиньтылы̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg3: ловиньтылын

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg3: ловиньтыя̄ныл
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg3: ловиньтыяныл

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcDu3: ловиньтыягум

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcDu3: ловиньтыягын

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcDu3: ловиньтыяге

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcDu3: ловиньтыягме̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcDu3: ловиньтыягмен

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcDu3: ловиньтыягы̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcDu3: ловиньтыягын

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcDu3: ловиньтыяге̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcDu3: ловиньтыяген

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcDu3: ловиньтыягув
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcDu3: ловиньтыягӯв

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcDu3: ловиньтыягы̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcDu3: ловиньтыягын

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcDu3: ловиньтыяга̄ныл
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcDu3: ловиньтыяганыл

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcPl3: ловиньтыянум

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcPl3: ловиньтыян

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl3: ловиньтыянэ

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcPl3: ловиньтыянме̄н

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcPl3: ловиньтыяны̄н

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcPl3: ловиньтыянэн

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl3: ловиньтыянӯв

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcPl3: ловиньтыяны̄н

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl3: ловиньтыя̄ныл
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl3: ловиньтыяна̄ныл
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl3: ловиньтыяныл

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcSg3: ловиньтаыслум

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcSg3: ловиньтаыслын

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcSg3: ловиньтаыстэ

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcSg3: ловиньтаысламе̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcSg3: ловиньтаысламен

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcSg3: ловиньтаыслы̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcSg3: ловиньтаыслын

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcSg3: ловиньтаыстэ̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcSg3: ловиньтаыстэн

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcSg3: ловиньтаслӯв
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcSg3: ловиньтаыслув

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcSg3: ловиньтаыслы̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcSg3: ловиньтаыслын

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcSg3: ловиньтаса̄ныл
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcSg3: ловиньтасаныл

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcDu3: ловиньтсагум

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcDu3: ловиньтсагын

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcDu3: ловиньтсаге

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcDu3: ловиньтсагме̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcDu3: ловиньтсагмен

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcDu3: ловиньтсагы̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcDu3: ловиньтсагын

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcDu3: ловиньтсаге̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcDu3: ловиньтсаген

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcDu3: ловиньтсагув

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcDu3: ловиньтсагы̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcDu3: ловиньтсагын

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcDu3: ловиньтса̄ныл
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcDu3: ловиньтсаганыл
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcDu3: ловиньтсаныл

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcPl3: ловиньтсанум

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcPl3: ловиньтсан

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcPl3: ловиньтсанэ

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcPl3: ловиньтсанме̄н

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcPl3: ловиньтсаны̄н

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcPl3: ловиньтсанэ̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcPl3: ловиньтсанэн

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcPl3: ловиньтсанув
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcPl3: ловиньтсанӯв

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcPl3: ловиньтсаны̄н

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcPl3: ловиньтсаныл

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg3: ловиньтнувлум
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg3: ловиньтнӯвлум

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg2+OcSg3: ловиньтнувлын
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg2+OcSg3: ловиньтнӯвлын

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg3: ловиньтнувтэ
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg3: ловиньтнӯвтэ

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu1+OcSg3: ловиньтнувламе̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu1+OcSg3: ловиньтнувламен

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu2+OcSg3: ловиньтнувлы̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu2+OcSg3: ловиньтнувлын

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu3+OcSg3: ловиньтнувтэ̄н

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg3: ловиньтнувлув

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg3: ловиньтнувлын

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg3: ловиньтнува̄ныл
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg3: ловиньтнуваныл

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg1+OcDu3: ловиньтнува̄гум
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg1+OcDu3: ловиньтнувагум

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg2+OcDu3: ловиньтнува̄гын
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg2+OcDu3: ловиньтнувагын

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg3+OcDu3: ловиньтнува̄ге
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg3+OcDu3: ловиньтнуваге

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu1+OcDu3: ловиньтнувагме̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu1+OcDu3: ловиньтнувагмен

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu2+OcDu3: ловиньтнувагы̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu2+OcDu3: ловиньтнувагын

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu3+OcDu3: ловиньтнуваге̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu3+OcDu3: ловиньтнуваген

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl1+OcDu3: ловиньтнувагув

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl2+OcDu3: ловиньтнувагы̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl2+OcDu3: ловиньтнувагын

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl3+OcDu3: ловиньтнувага̄ныл

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg1+OcPl3: ловиньтнува̄нум
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg1+OcPl3: ловиньтнуванум

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg2+OcPl3: ловиньтнува̄нын
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg2+OcPl3: ловиньтнуванын

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl3: ловиньтнува̄нэ
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl3: ловиньтнуванэ

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu1+OcPl3: ловиньтнуванме̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu1+OcPl3: ловиньтнуванмен

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu2+OcPl3: ловиньтнуваны̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu2+OcPl3: ловиньтнуванын

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu3+OcPl3: ловиньтнуванэ̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu3+OcPl3: ловиньтнуванэн

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl3: ловиньтнуванув

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl2+OcPl3: ловиньтнуваны̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl2+OcPl3: ловиньтнуванын

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl3: ловиньтнува̄ныл
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl3: ловиньтнуваныл

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Imprt+ScSg2+OcSg3: ловиньтэлн

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Imprt+ScDu2+OcSg3: ловиньтэлн

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Imprt+ScPl2+OcSg3: ловиньтэлн

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Imprt+ScSg2+OcDu3: ловиньтэгын

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Imprt+ScDu2+OcDu3: ловиньтэгын

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Imprt+ScPl2+OcDu3: ловиньтэгын

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Imprt+ScSg2+OcPl3: ловиньтэ̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Imprt+ScSg2+OcPl3: ловиньтэн

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Imprt+ScDu2+OcPl3: ловиньтэ̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Imprt+ScDu2+OcPl3: ловиньтэн

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Imprt+ScPl2+OcPl3: ловиньтэ̄н

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScSg1: ловиньтавем

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScSg2: ловиньтавен

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScSg3: ловиньтаве

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScDu1: ловиньтавеме̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScDu1: ловиньтавемен
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScDu1: ловиньтавемена

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScDu2: ловиньтаве̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScDu2: ловиньтавен
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScDu2: ловиньтавена

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScDu3: ловиньтаве̄г
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScDu3: ловиньтавег
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScDu3: ловиньтавега

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScPl1: ловиньтаве̄в
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScPl1: ловиньтавева

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScPl2: ловиньтаве̄н
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScPl2: ловиньтавен
#    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScPl2: ловиньтавена

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScPl3: ловиньтавет

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Pass+Prt+ScSg1: ловиньтаве̄сум

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Pass+Prt+ScSg2: ловиньтаве̄сын

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Pass+Prt+ScSg3: ловиньтавес

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Pass+Prt+ScDu1: ловиньтавесме̄н

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Pass+Prt+ScDu2: ловиньтавесы̄н

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Pass+Prt+ScDu3: ловиньтавесы̄г

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Pass+Prt+ScPl1: ловиньтавесӯв

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Pass+Prt+ScPl2: ловиньтавесы̄н

    ловиньтаӈкве+V+Pass+Prt+ScPl3: ловиньтаве̄сыт
